Utah statutes.
63G-6a-1502.   Policy regarding architect-engineer services.

(1)  It is the policy of this state to publicly announce all requirements for architect-engineer services and to negotiate contracts for architect-engineer services on the basis of demonstrated competence and qualification for the type of services required, and at fair and reasonable prices.

(2)  Architect-engineer services shall be procured as provided in this part except as  otherwise provided in Sections 63G-6a-403, 63G-6a-404, 63G-6a-408, 63G-6a-802, and 63G-6a-803.

(3)  This part does not affect the authority of, and does not apply to procedures undertaken by, a procurement unit to obtain the services of architects or engineers in the capacity of employees of the procurement unit.



Amended by Chapter 445, 2013 General Session

